Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2326.04
Public money in hands of court officials; deposits; security for repayment.

No deposits in excess of the amount insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation shall be made to accumulate in any bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution designated as a depository unless and until the county judge, clerk of the county court, or clerk of the district court, as the case may be, has received from such depository as security for the prompt repayment by the depository of his or her respective deposits in excess of the amount insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation either a surety bond in form and with corporate sureties approved by the county judge or judges or by formal resolution of the county board, as the case may be, or in lieu thereof, the giving of security as provided in the Public Funds Deposit Security Act. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1947, c. 269, § 4, p. 869;

Laws 1959, c. 263, § 16, p. 946;

Laws 1988, LB 703, § 4;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 46;

Laws 1989, LB 377, § 14;

Laws 1990, LB 1146, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 356, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 33;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 46;

Laws 2009, LB259, § 16.
March 6, 2009
Public Funds Deposit Security Act, see section 77-2386.